Utah statutes.
63M-1-2604.   Committee for reviewing proposals -- Appointment -- Accepting or rejecting proposal.

(1)  The director shall appoint a committee composed of members of the board to review and evaluate a proposal submitted in accordance with this part.

(2)  The director shall determine the number of board members that constitute a committee.

(3)  The committee shall, at all times, consist of less than a quorum of the members of the board, as established under Section 63M-1-301.

(4)  A committee member shall serve on the committee until:

(a)  replaced by the director; or

(b)  the committee member ceases to be a member of the board.

(5)  The director may fill a vacancy among voting members on the committee.

(6)  The committee shall include the following nonvoting members in addition to the members appointed under Subsection (1):

(a)  a member of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate; and

(b)  a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives, who may not be from the same political party as the member of the Senate appointed under Subsection (6)(a).

(7) (a)  A vacancy among legislative members appointed under Subsection (6) shall be filled by the president of the Senate or the speaker of the House of Representatives, respectively.

(b)  At the time of appointment or reappointment, the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives shall consult to ensure that the legislative members appointed under Subsection (6) are not members of the same political party.

(8)  A committee member is subject to Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act, and any additional requirement established by the board in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(9)  The committee shall inform a private entity of the committee's decision to approve or reject a proposal in writing.

(10)  If the committee, in its sole discretion, accepts a proposal, the proposal shall be evaluated under this part.

(11)  If the committee, in its sole discretion, rejects a proposal, the committee shall notify the private entity of the reason for the rejection and shall return any remaining portion of the fee required under Section 63M-1-2612.



Enacted by Chapter 352, 2008 General Session

